nb: Håndklevev: Flatvev; Bikake; Jacquard; Med riller; Terry; Velour; Vaffel; Annet
sl-SI: Tkanje brisače: Plosko tkanje; Satje; Žakard; Rebrasta; Terry; Velur; Vafelj; Druga
en: Towel weave: Flat weave; Honeycomb; Jacquard; Ribbed; Terry; Velour; Waffle; Other
nl: Handdoekstof: Vlakgeweven; Honingraat; Jacquard; Geribbeld; Badstof; Velours; Wafel; Overig
fi: Pyyhkeen kudostyyppi: Sileäkudoksinen; Hunajakenno; Jacquard; Ribbineulottu; Terrykankainen; Velour; Vohveli; Muu
it: Tessuto dell'asciugamano: Tessitura piatta; Honeycomb; Jacquard; A coste; Terry; Velour; Waffle; Altro
hr-HR: Tkanje ručnika: Ravno tkanje; Saće; Žakard; Rebrasta; Frotir; Velur; Vafl; Ostalo
hu: Törölköző szövete: Síkszövött; Méhsejt alakú; Jacquard; Bordázott; Frottír; Velúr; Ostya; Egyéb
de: Handtuchgewebe: Flachgewebe; Honeycomb; Jacquard; Gerippt; Terry; Velours; Waffel; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип тъкане на кърпата: Плоско тъкано; Пчелна пита; Жакард; С релефни райета; Terry; Велур; Вафлички; Друго
es: Tejido de la toalla: Tejido plano; Panal; Jacquard; Acanalado; Terry; Terciopelo; Gofre; Otros
sv: Handduksväv: Platt väv; Honeycomb; Jacquard; Ribbad; Terry; Velour; Våffla; Annat
da: Håndklædevævning: Fladvævet; Honeycomb; Jacquard; Med riller; Terry; Velour; Vaffel; Andet
tr: Havlu dokuma tipi: Düz dokuma; Bal peteği; Jakarlı; Yivli; Havlu dokuma; Velür; Waffle; Diğer
pt-PT: Tecido da toalha: Tecelagem plana; Favo de mel; Jacquard; Canelado; Terry; Aveludado; Waffle; Outro
ja: タオル織り: 平織り; ハニカム; ジャカード; リブ付き; テリー; ベロア; ワッフル; その他
el: Ύφανση πετσέτας: Επίπεδη ύφανση; Honeycomb; Ζακάρ; Ριγέ; Είδος υφάσματος; Βελουτέ; Κυματιστή; Άλλο
zh-CN: 毛巾织法: 平织; 蜂窝; 提花; 罗纹; 毛圈; 丝绒; 格子; 其他
zh-TW: 毛巾織法: 平織; 蜂巢式; 提花; 羅紋; 純棉毛巾布; 絲絨; 格子鬆餅; 其他
th: ลักษณะการทอผ้าขนหนู: ทอผ้าทรงแบน; รังผึ้ง; จาการ์ด; แบบร่อง; ทอแบบเทอร์รี่; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; วัฟเฟิล; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип плетения полотенца: Плоское плетение; Сотовое; Жаккард; В рубчик; Махровое; Велюр; Вафельное; Другое
pl: Splot tkaniny ręcznika: Splot płaski; Plaster miodu; Żakard; Żebrowane; Frotte; Welur; Waflowe; Inne
ko: 타월 직조 방식: 평직; 벌집; 자카드; 골이 있는; 테리 직물; 벨루어; 와플; 기타
fr: Tissage de serviette: Tissage plat; Honeycomb; Jacquard; Nervuré; Tissu éponge; Velours; Gaufre; Autre
sk-SK: Tkanina uterákov: Hladké tkanie; Honeycomb; Žakár; Vrúbkovanie; Froté; Velúr; Vafle; Iné
lt-LT: Rankšluosčio audimo tipas: Plokščias pynimas; Korio formos; Jacquard; Briaunotas; Terry; Veliūras; Vaflinis; Kita
cs: Způsob tkaní ručníku: Plochá vazba; Včelí plástev; Žakárový vzor; Žebrovaný vzor; Froté; Velur; Vaflový vzor; Jiné
vi: Dệt khăn: Dệt phẳng; Honeycomb; Vải Jacquard; Có gân; Vải xù; Vải velour; Bánh quế; Khác
ro-RO: Țesătura prosopului: Țesătură plată; Fagure; Jacard; Nervurat; Buclat; Velour; Vafă; Altele
pt-BR: Tecido da toalha: Trama plana; Favo de mel; Jacquard; Com nervuras; Tecido atoalhado; Veludo; Waffle; Outro